test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-15kotus_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kotus: # Noun (15) kotus 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom: kotus
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen: kotusõ
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Par: kotust
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ill: kotussõhe
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ine: kotussõn
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ela: kotussõst
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+All: kotussõlõ
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ade: kotussõl
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Abl: kotussõlt
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Tra: kotussõs
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ter: kotussõniq
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Abe: kotussõldaq
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Com: kotusõgaq
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom: kotusõq
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen: kotussidõ
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Par: kotussit
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ill: kotussihe
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ine: kotussin
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ela: kotussist
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+All: kotussilõ
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ade: kotussil
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Abl: kotussilt
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Tra: kotussis
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ter: kotussiniq
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Abe: kotussildaq
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Com: kotussidõgaq
